Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-223
Verifiable retail value, defined.

Verifiable retail value means the price (1) at which the solicitor or sponsor can demonstrate that a substantial number of prizes have been sold within the prior twelve months by a person other than the solicitor in the trade area in which the prize notice is given or (2) no more than one and one-half times the amount the solicitor or sponsor paid for the prize.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 85.